California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
It is the public policy of the State of California to provide for comprehensive statewide and local manpower planning, to improve the efficiency of, and the accountability for, delivery systems for manpower programs, to promptly place job-ready individuals in suitable jobs, to provide qualified job applicants to employers, to assist potentially employable individuals to become job ready, and to create employment opportunities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

In enacting the Employment Development Act of 1973, the Legislature further finds and declares that it is essential to the health and welfare of the people of this state that action be taken by local, state and federal governments to effectively and economically utilize public funds for job training and placement services. To achieve this, it is necessary that:

(a) Explicit priorities be established for the allocation of these funds to ensure that they are first used to assist those in greatest need for job training and placement services;

(b) Definitive goals be established for the total system of job training and placement services to maximize the effectiveness of the system in assisting individuals to find and maintain gainful, competitive employment;

(c) Efforts be made to enlist the full support of private industry in securing jobs for enrollees of training programs, and a closer, more integrated and coordinated effort be established with the federal government as well as state and local public and private agencies involved in performing job training and placement services; and

(d) New approaches involving improved services and changes in traditional organization structures be used to assist persons in economically disadvantaged areas.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature to concentrate and account for the funds available for job training and placement services in one state agency whose functions shall be subject to periodic review by the Legislature and appropriate federal agencies, and to which is assigned the responsibility for the efficient administration of job training and placement services in this state and the allocation of these funds to the end that such funds will be more effectively utilized and will be directed primarily to those areas of the state with the largest concentrations of chronically unemployed persons.

It is the further intent of the Legislature (a) to maintain policy control over all job training and placement programs administered by the department pursuant to this part to the maximum extent feasible, consistent with effective program operations, (b) to organize existing job training and placement programs now operating in the state into a coordinated system designed to remove employable persons from dependency on public assistance, and to enlist the full support of private industry in securing jobs, (c) to use funds for job training and placement services in a flexible manner to provide needed services for individuals through contractual arrangements with public and private agencies, (d) to provide a unified system for timely delivery of improved job training placement and related services to eligible persons including individual case responsibility, an outreach effort to seek out those persons who need but do not apply for services, followup to insure that the needs of eligible persons and their families are met, dissemination of information and knowledge to residents of the economically disadvantaged area about available services, and location of services in areas readily accessible to those who need them, and (e) to involve members of each community in identifying the needs to be met and relating them to the services available in order to reduce the isolation of the disadvantaged from their government and the community as a whole and to improve their confidence in government at all levels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

Subject to the provisions of Sections 9600 and 9605, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall coordinate all job training placement, and related programs, conducted by state agencies, with the federal government and ensure that there is no duplication of the programs among state agencies and that all agreements, contracts, plans, or programs conform to the provisions of this part. Any plan proposed to be submitted by any agency to the federal government in relation to a job training, placement, or related program, shall first be submitted to the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency for his or her review. The Health and Welfare Agency may require state departments to contract with it for services to carry out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, individuals with disabilities who are clients of the Department of Rehabilitation shall not be barred as participants in manpower programs, including, but not limited to, retraining programs, work incentive programs, job training and placement programs, career opportunity development programs, and vocational educational programs, because of their mental or physical disability when certified by the Department of Rehabilitation as being potentially employable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

Upon receipt of a formal ruling from the United States Secretary of Labor, the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, or the head of any federal agency that any provision of Chapter 1206 of the Statutes of 1973 or Chapter 1212 of the Statutes of 1973 cannot be given effect without causing the state’s plan to be out of conformity with federal requirements or would result in decertification of provisions of this code and notification of intention to withdraw federal funds from the state, that provision shall become inoperative to the extent that it is not in conformity with federal requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 159.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [9100. - 9115.]

9100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

“Department” means the Employment Development Department, which may also be referred to as the Department of Employment Development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 503.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

“Director” means the Director of Employment Development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

“State agency” means those agencies enumerated in Section 11000 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

“Job training and placement services” or “job training and placement programs” means any job training, placement, or related services administered or supervised by or provided under contract with the department, directly calculated to increase employability or improve the employment of the individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9108.

“Unemployed person” means a person who lacks a bona fide employment, suffers economic deprivation because of lack of employment, and is employable or capable of being made employable through the services available under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

9109.

“Underemployed person” means a person who has a bona fide employment but whose employment, be it full time, or part time, or intermittent, is insufficient to provide an income adequate to avoid economic deprivation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

9110.

“Economic deprivation” means annual income insufficient to enable the family or individual to meet a table of income criteria adopted by the director, which takes appropriate factors into account, including, but not limited to, the level indicated by multiplying by 3 the cost of the Low Cost Food Plan of the United States Department of Agriculture for the Western Region of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1000.)
-------------------------------------------

9111.

(a) “Economically disadvantaged area” means an area which meets all of the following requirements:

(1) It is composed of contiguous census tracts within or partly within an urbanized area as defined by the most recent federal census for which statistics are available.

(2) In the area 20 percent of the families report annual income less than four thousand dollars ($4,000) according to the most recent federal census for which statistics are available.

(3) The area has a population of not less than 25,000.

(b) “Economically disadvantaged area” also includes any portion of an area if:

(1) Such portion is within or partly within an urbanized area but because of technical factors such portion cannot be isolated as a census tract or tracts or cannot be isolated as a “contiguous” census tract; and

(2) The total area when such portion is included meets the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) The director shall periodically review the definition set forth in this section and Section 9110, and he shall recommend necessary changes to the Legislature and the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9112.

“Eligible person” means an unemployed person or underemployed person who resides in an economically disadvantaged area or resides outside of an economically disadvantaged area but who resides in a county in which an economically disadvantaged area exists and qualifies under criteria established by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

9115.

“Economically displaced persons” means those persons who have been subjected to an involuntary layoff or separation from their employment, and who have not quit voluntarily or been dismissed for disciplinary reasons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1563.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Employment Development Department [9500. - 9925.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [9500. - 9502.]

9500.

The department shall administer all job training and placement programs and services for eligible persons as defined in this division, except as otherwise provided by federal statute or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

For purposes of administration, the director may establish such offices as are appropriate for the administration of this part. Offices administering programs under this part shall be established to the fullest extent possible in economically disadvantaged areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [9600. - 9619.]

9600.

(a) The department shall represent the state and local governments upon their request in dealing with the federal government regarding the kinds and quality of job training and placement, employability, and related programs contained in the statewide plan described in subdivision (b), which are administered by or in the State of California pursuant to this division.

(b) The department shall develop a statewide plan and area plans to coordinate all programs it administers pursuant to this division and shall present such plans annually to the Legislature. Such plans shall include, but not be
 limited to, the review required in Section 9604.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9600.7.

(a) The department shall have the authority to administer the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act including, but not limited to, establishing accounting, monitoring, auditing, and reporting procedures and criteria in order to ensure state compliance with the objectives and requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(b) The department shall adopt, amend, or repeal any rules and regulations as necessary to implement Division 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 2.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.

The department may enter into any contractual agreements with public agencies, community action agencies, private organizations and individuals which are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part. Priority in contracts for services to carry out the provisions of this part shall be given to community action agencies, if the director determines that the agency can effectively provide such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

(a) The director shall designate economically disadvantaged areas. These areas shall be priority areas for services provided under this part. To the fullest extent possible, offices shall be established within the boundaries of the disadvantaged areas designated by the director.

(b) To the extent permitted by law, the department shall serve eligible persons in such a way as to prevent discrimination by serving persons whose minority group characteristics coincide to the fullest extent possible with the minority group characteristics of the unemployed and underemployed in the economically
 disadvantaged areas of their community.

A minority shall be interpreted to include women to assure equality of opportunity in employment in accordance with Executive Order 11478 under the Federal Affirmative Action Program.

(c) The department shall to the extent permitted by law provide services under this part in accordance with the following priorities:

(1) Unemployed heads of households.

(2) Underemployed heads of households.

(3) Other unemployed and underemployed persons.

(4) Veterans shall be accorded priority pursuant to federal law.

(d) For purposes of this division, women as
 a class shall be deemed to constitute a minority group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1468.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.5.

The department shall establish, in conjunction with the Department of Social Services, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Department of Education, and the Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges, a systemwide policy of actively promoting the training of women in nontraditional occupations. For purposes of this section, “nontraditional occupations” means any job classification in which not more than 25 percent of the employees are women, according to the statistics of the United States Department of Labor.

This section is not intended, and shall not be construed, to require any local
 agency to make any expenditures to further the policy set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

(a) The department shall establish necessary data systems which shall provide administrative information on persons served including, but not limited to, the following information:

(1) Pertinent data on the characteristics of persons served.

(2) The services provided.

(3) The results of services provided.

(b) The department shall also compile annually a report for the state and its principal labor market areas. The report shall contain information on the characteristics of the unemployed and analyses of current trends and projections for population, labor force, employment, and unemployment and shall be provided on a regular basis to cooperative area manpower systems councils or successors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

The department shall:

(a) Conduct the state manpower program, with the exception of manpower programs conducted by units of local general purpose government.

(b) Be the sole state agency to approve and coordinate publicly funded job training and placement programs, which it administers. The department shall approve programs only if consistent with the plans developed under Section 9600 and other provisions of this division.

(c) Be responsible for developing program objectives for each category of the service program it administers, establishing cost-effective results measurement, and providing accountability for results as related to the objectives set.

(d) Appoint an advisory committee of representatives of employers and employer organizations to enlist the advice and support of private industry in developing a statewide system for making jobs available to job trainees following successful completion of job training and placement programs.

(e) Develop controls to insure that job training and placement programs, it administers meet existing labor market needs as viewed by employers. The department shall study training and personnel selection methods used successfully by private industry.

(f) Encourage placement of eligible persons in public employment with the assistance of an advisory group representing state and local officials and representatives of economically disadvantaged areas appointed by the department.

(g) Evaluate the need for specific new public employment opportunities.

(h) Determine the kinds and quality of job training and placement programs, it administers necessary to provide placement in public employment for eligible persons and develop means to realign job tasks to develop greater employment opportunities for eligible persons.

(i) Cooperate with the State Personnel Board and local personnel officials in developing and upgrading employment opportunities for and in eliminating unnecessary barriers to the placement of eligible persons in public employment.

The State Personnel Board and other state and local agencies shall cooperate to the maximum extent feasible to achieve the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

The state manpower program shall serve the needs of employers by providing them with referrals of qualified job applicants. In addition the manpower program shall assist those individuals who are ready for employment, those who are employable with some direct assistance, and those individuals who are potentially employable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.

In the administration of the state manpower program, the director shall establish community employment development centers. Within his administrative discretion, he shall determine the number, location and management structure for community employment development centers based on identified community needs. Each center shall be responsible for identifying and meeting manpower needs within the community and for maintaining current community labor market information. This labor market information shall be the basis for more realistic direction to manpower and vocational training efforts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9608.

The director shall, within each community employment development center, establish an intake system to appraise the individual needs of applicants. Each community employment development center shall provide the following services:

(a) Job referral and labor market information services to applicants who are occupationally competitive and qualified by training or experience in the labor market. These applicants shall be encouraged to utilize self-help services.

(b) Employment exploration and job development services to applicants who are employable but need some directed assistance in planning an effective job search or coping with minor barriers to employment. Employment exploration and job development services are designed as follows:

(1) To prepare groups of applicants to use job referral and information services by instructing them in job finding techniques and how to initiate their own job search.

(2) To assist applicants directly by developing job opportunities.

(3) To provide, as necessary, usually on a one-time basis, the following services:

(A) Contacting an employer to explain an applicant’s qualifications or limitations, such as a
 disability not affecting ability to work, in relation to requirements for a particular job and arranging an interview.

(B) A more thorough appraisal of the applicant’s capabilities and desires in relation to the job market than is required of an applicant seeking only job referral and labor market information.

(4) To arrange for short-term supplemental services.

(c) Individual employability development and placement services to applicants who are potentially employable but are in need of more intensive services before becoming employable because they have vocational barriers due to disability, lack of skills, obsolescence of job skills, limited education, or poor work habits and attitudes. Intensive employability services shall be provided by case-responsible persons to applicants where case-responsible persons are
 assigned.

(d) Through case managers or case-responsible persons, case services to applicants to the extent funds are available. Case services funds may be made available for services to the disadvantaged. “Case services” means an applicant’s expenses necessary for or incident to training or employability development and includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Medical and dental treatment necessary for employability.

(2) Temporary child care.

(3) Transportation costs.

(4) Wearing apparel.

(5) Books and supplies.

(6) Tools and safety equipment.

(7) Union fees.

(8) Business license fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 649.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9609.

The department shall administer manpower service funds and shall provide, in a balanced and flexible manner, needed services as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9610.

The director may enter into contracts for public and private job training and placement programs as may be required, and shall maintain quarterly projections of manpower needs in the public and private sector in each area.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9606 by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9612.

The employees of the department shall be subject to the State Civil Service Act, except for exempt appointees. Members of the California Commission on Aging shall continue to be appointed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 819, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

9613.

(a) The director shall make every effort to secure to the fullest extent possible federal funds available for participation under this part and shall provide that effective and comprehensive placement and manpower information services are made available to eligible persons, both youth and adults, who are served by the department, using funds available to the department under Title III and Title IX of the Social Security Act, in accordance with a plan of service developed by the department and approved by the United States Department of Labor as required by federal law and regulations.

(b) Under a plan of service developed by the department, funds under Title III and Title IX used for the administration of employment service offices and funds under the Manpower Development and Training Act shall be used to administer programs designed to find employment for economically displaced personnel toward the end of meeting the following goals:

(1) Developing a broad inventory of skills of displaced workers.

(2) Establishing labor market information systems necessary to identify the need for skills in waste disposal, power, water reclamation, sea water conversion, communications, biomedical techniques, air pollution control, and transportation systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

9615.

Eligible persons who are registrants pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall receive priority for services. The department shall use up to 50 percent of the funds available to it pursuant to Section 7(b) of the federal Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49f) to provide for job services required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11320.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9616.

(a) The department, in coordination with the United States Department of Defense and the various branches of the military of the United States, shall determine which military occupational specialties have civilian counterpart jobs that require licensure by state or local agencies.

(b) The department shall further determine, to the degree possible, if any procedural, financial, technological, educational, or bureaucratic barriers exist that impede military personnel reentering
 the civilian workforce from acquiring these licenses.

(c) The department shall implement this section only to the extent federal funds are available for the costs of implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 216.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9616.1.

(a) The department shall convene groups that represent local department field offices, county welfare departments, local workforce investment areas, and community colleges for the purpose of developing a local plan on how these entities will regularly coordinate employer outreach activities and the solicitation of entry-level and other job listings, in order to reduce duplication of effort and to enhance the overall job development activities. Each local plan shall be signed by the local entities convened pursuant to this subdivision and
 submitted to the department.

(b) The entities involved in formulating each local plan and the department shall review each plan on at least an annual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9617.

(a) To the extent that funds are provided in the Budget Act of 2000 for the purposes of providing competitive grants to faith-based organizations that are not owned or operated as pervasively sectarian organizations, those organizations receiving funding shall demonstrate that they are able to meet the following six criteria in the provision of services:

(1) Establishing linkages with local workforce development service delivery systems.

(2) Leveraging resources through collaboration and partnerships.

(3) Establishing intermediate and long-term outcome goals, with measurable indicators.

(4) Collecting and maintaining data that can be used for management decisionmaking.

(5) Using data to assess progress and evaluate effectiveness.

(6) Sharing information with stakeholders.

(b) The department shall provide technical assistance to organizations as needed to enable them to meet the six criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall collect and analyze
 the following information as it relates to the organizations funded under this section:

(1) The number of participants who experienced job placements, wage gains, increased job retention, increased educational achievement, and reduced use of public assistance programs.

(2) The cost per participant.

(3) Organizations’ effectiveness in serving populations with barriers to employment who are missed by traditional service providers.

(4) The department’s success in transitioning the organizations to longer-term funding sources.

(d) The department shall provide an interim report with regard to the competitive grants provided under this section to the Legislature on or before May 15, 2001, and
 shall provide a final report to the Legislature on or before September 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 17.5.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9618.

(a) The department shall administer a solar training program. The department shall coordinate with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards and the State Contractors’ License Board to ensure solar energy product and service providers in California possess and maintain the necessary skills, training, and certification.

(b) Elements of the training program shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The science of photovoltaics and small scale solar thermal technologies.

(2) The design of solar systems.

(3) The installation of solar systems.

(4) Permitting of solar systems.

(5) Safety.

(6) System and component certification.

(7) State and federal incentive programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 4.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9619.

(a) (1) To the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the department may award grants to regional collaboratives for the creation of regional nursing simulation laboratories that will allow additional nursing students to have access to clinical educational facilities. No single grant made under this section may exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(2) During the 2005–06 fiscal year, all grants made
 under this section shall be made for the creation of regional nursing simulation laboratories that serve rural areas.

(b) The department shall administer grants made under this section, and shall establish procedures and criteria for the awarding of those grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 73.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. San Diego Multiuse Biotechnology Training Center [9700. - 9702.]

9700.

For purposes of this article, “center” means the San Diego Multiuse Biotechnology Training Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9701.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Biotechnology represents one of the most promising, innovation-based growth industries of this era. California is the nation’s leading state in biotechnology innovation and production.

(2) The San Diego region, as the world’s third largest biotechnology industry cluster, is host to world-class generators of science and technology in biotechnology and the related life sciences.

(3) Despite the specialized nature of emerging biotechnology firms, their recent growth has been extensive, and with that growth has come an ever-increasing demand for trained biotechnology workers at all levels. The industry’s workforce has grown at an annual rate of about 15 percent over the past five years, and California’s biotechnology workforce could easily grow to over 250,000 by the year 2015 from its current level of 100,000.

(4) Biotechnology employers need entry-level and advanced professionals that have a background in, and familiarity with, industrylike conditions for basic, applied, and translational research, development, and production. Based on recent studies, there is a clear and strong demand for applied bioscience training, but that demand is currently not being met by the region’s universities and colleges.

(5) Companies nationally have overwhelmingly endorsed an “industry-focused” approach of providing internship training programs directly with the companies, combined with “company-like” training activities.

(6) Many firms have identified the difficulty in finding entry level biotechnology workers at both the graduate and undergraduate levels as being directly related to the students’ lack of applied industry training or exposure. Many firms have had to extensively train new employees to teach them how to function in a biotechnology business environment. Additionally, nearly three-fourths of firms surveyed in San Diego and nationally have indicated that they would benefit from being able to hire workers that have been prepared to enter the workforce through advanced biotechnology internships and training of a “specific” nature.

(7) San Diego and the surrounding area is served by many well-recognized academic institutions, from community colleges to universities offering doctorate programs, that supply educated workers to the biotechnology industry. At each academic level (AA, BS/BA, MS/MA, Ph.D.) curricula are in place, but most of the curricula are only marginally related to biotechnology workforce preparation in the applied sector. Applied education in the form of internships or instruction in practical science skills that would smooth the transition from academic institutions to the commercial biotechnology environment is even less prevalent than the biotechnology curricula offered at many schools, and is only now just emerging.

(8) Many of California’s firms have found that many students graduate from four-year university programs with adequate conceptual understanding of biotechnology, but with relatively little practical laboratory experience, especially in the skills and protocols that are specific to commercial ventures as opposed to academic research.

(9) In 2001, the Legislature created the Pasadena Bioscience Center to address biotechnology workforce needs in the Los Angeles region. The Pasadena Bioscience Center provides applied workforce training and includes components for research and innovation, new business incubation, and bioinformatics. In cooperation with California State University, the City of Pasadena, Pasadena City College, the California Institute of Technology, Huntington Medical Research Institutes, and local biotechnology companies and organizations, the Pasadena Bioscience Center serves as a successful model of focused education and training, tailored to specific industry needs, and that may be utilized in other areas of the state.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that to address workforce needs in biotechnology, a multiuse biotechnology training center is being created in San Diego to serve as an anchor and catalyst for the growth of biotechnology enterprises in San Diego. The center will operate as a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and will serve as a catalyst for accelerating the growth and formation of new bioscience enterprises that will create value-added jobs and high economic multipliers in the San Diego region. For this purpose:

(1) The center will provide state-of-the-art, industry-oriented bioscience training and act as a strong contributor to the growth and retention of bioscience companies in the region. As such, the center, as proposed, will help encourage biotechnology companies to remain in the region, thereby offsetting the pull of other, less expensive business environments that have been recruiting both startup and existing local area bioscience companies.

(2) The center will utilize the organization, programs, and work of the Pasadena Bioscience Center as successful models in the development of the San Diego Multiuse Biotechnology Training Center and its programs.

(3) The new center will serve as a world class biotechnology workforce training facility offering practical, hands-on learning experiences, including short-term workshops and courses, and more extended training that will involve putting together multidisciplinary, multilevel teams of researchers, technicians, production specialists, apprentices, and students to work in a businesslike environment.

(4) The center will coordinate an extensive applied biotechnology internship program that will place students in local biotechnology companies for practical training and experience.

(5) The center will have the most relevant and advanced training possible, including an emphasis in bioinformatics, that will ensure that the center attains a position at the forefront of this rapidly expanding, cross-application specialization within biotechnology.

(6) The center will have facilities and a collection of instruments not generally available to the region’s secondary schools, colleges, or universities.

(7) The center can serve as a capstone training site for regional institutions.

(8) The center will address the needs of existing as well as future industry employees.

(9) The center may appoint directors to a board of directors, and existing participants in the center may serve as the original board of directors. The center may appoint new directors, as necessary, in its discretion.

(10) The center will work with private universities, companies, associations, and various public agencies through memoranda of understanding under Section 9702, for the purpose of coordinating services and receiving assistance and support.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

The San Diego Community College District, California State University, University of California, Employment Development Department, Employment Training Panel, California Health and Human Services Agency, Labor and Workforce Development Agency, California Workforce Investment Board, and the San Diego Workforce Partnership may enter into memoranda of understanding with the center to utilize existing staff and resources to provide any of the following:

(a) Funding, if moneys are appropriated.

(b) Staff.

(c) Program development.

(d) Outreach.

(e) Coordination.

(f) Implementation.

(g) Strategy.

(h) Physical office, administration, and training space.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California YouthBuild Program [9800. - 9809.5.]

9800.

The purposes of the California YouthBuild Program shall be all of the following:

(a) To enable economically disadvantaged youth, especially youth who have not finished high school, to obtain the education, job skills training, personal counseling, leadership development skills training, job placement assistance, and long-term followup services necessary for them to achieve permanent economic self-sufficiency, while at the same time providing valuable community service that addresses urgent community needs, including the demand for affordable housing and the need for young role models and mentors for younger teenagers and children.

(b) To provide communities with the opportunity to establish or rebuild neighborhood stability in economically depressed and low-income areas, as well as historic areas requiring restoration or preservation, while providing economically disadvantaged youth, and youth who have not finished high school, an opportunity for a meaningful participation in society.

(c) To allow communities to expand the supply of affordable housing for homeless and other low-income individuals by utilizing the energies and talents of economically disadvantaged youth and young people who have not graduated from school.
